Nebraska, session 109, LB1168.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1168 LB1168
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 18-2101.02, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
18-2101.02 (1) For any city that (a) intends to prepare a
redevelopment plan that will divide ad valorem taxes for a period of more
than fifteen years but not more than twenty years as provided in
subdivision (5)(a) (4)(a) of section 18-2147, (b) intends to declare an
area as an extremely blighted area for purposes of funding decisions
under subdivision (1)(b) of section 58-708, or (c) intends to declare an
area as an extremely blighted area in order for individuals purchasing
residences in such area to qualify for the income tax credit authorized
in subsection (7) of section 77-2715.07, the governing body of such city
shall first declare, by resolution adopted after the public hearings
required under this section, such area to be an extremely blighted area.
(2) Prior to making such declaration, the governing body of the city
shall conduct or cause to be conducted a study or an analysis on whether
the area is extremely blighted and shall submit the question of whether
such area is extremely blighted to the planning commission or board of
the city for its review and recommendation. The planning commission or
board shall hold a public hearing on the question after giving notice of
the hearing as provided in section 18-2115.01. The planning commission or
board shall submit its written recommendations to the governing body of
the city within thirty days after the public hearing.
(3) Upon receipt of the recommendations of the planning commission
or board, or if no recommendations are received within thirty days after
the public hearing required under subsection (2) of this section, the
governing body shall hold a public hearing on the question of whether the
area is extremely blighted after giving notice of the hearing as provided
in section 18-2115.01. At the public hearing, all interested parties
shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to express their views
respecting the proposed declaration. After such hearing, the governing
body of the city may make its declaration.
-2-

LB1168 LB1168
2026 2026
(4) Copies of each study or analysis conducted pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section shall be posted on the city's public
website or made available for public inspection at a location designated
by the city.
(5) The study or analysis required under subsection (2) of this
section may be conducted in conjunction with the study or analysis
required under section 18-2109. The hearings required under this section
may be held in conjunction with the hearings required under section
18-2109.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Community
Development Law, the designation of an area as an extremely blighted area
pursuant to this section shall be valid for a period of no less than
twenty-five years from the effective date of the resolution declaring
such area to be an extremely blighted area, except that such designation
may be removed prior to the end of such period pursuant to section
18-2156.
Sec. 2. Section 18-2117.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
18-2117.01 (1)(a) On or before December 1 each year, each city which
has approved one or more redevelopment plans which are financed in whole
or in part through the division of taxes as provided in section 18-2147
shall provide a report to the Property Tax Administrator on each such
redevelopment plan which includes the following information:
(i) A copy of the redevelopment plan and any amendments thereto,
including the date upon which the redevelopment plan was approved, the
effective date for dividing the ad valorem tax as provided to the county
assessor pursuant to subsection (7) (6) of section 18-2147, and the
location and boundaries of the property in the redevelopment project; and
(ii) A short narrative description of the type of development
undertaken by the city or village with the financing and the type of
business or commercial activity locating within the redevelopment project
-3-

LB1168 LB1168
2026 2026
area as a result of the redevelopment project.
(b) If a city has approved one or more redevelopment plans using an
expedited review under section 18-2155, the city may file a single report
under this subsection for all such redevelopment plans.
(2) The report required under subsection (1) of this section must be
filed each year, regardless of whether the information in the report has
changed, except that a city is not required to refile a copy of the
redevelopment plan or an amendment thereto if such copy or amendment has
previously been filed.
(3) The Property Tax Administrator shall compile a report for each
active redevelopment project, based upon information provided by the
cities pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and information
reported by the county assessor or county clerk on the certificate of
taxes levied pursuant to section 77-1613.01. Each report shall be
electronically transmitted to the Clerk of the Legislature not later than
March 1 each year. The report may include any recommendations of the
Property Tax Administrator as to what other information should be
included in the report from the cities so as to facilitate analysis of
the uses, purposes, and effectiveness of tax-increment financing and the
process for its implementation or to streamline the reporting process
provided for in this section to eliminate unnecessary paperwork.
Sec. 3. Section 18-2124, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-2124 An authority may issue bonds, including conduit revenue
bonds subject to a taxpayer agreement entered into pursuant to subsection
(3) of section 18-2147, from time to time in its discretion for any of
its corporate purposes, including the payment of principal and interest
upon any advances for surveys and plans for redevelopment projects. An
authority may also issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying,
retiring, or otherwise refinancing or in exchange for any or all of the
principal or interest upon bonds previously issued by the authority. An
-4-

LB1168 LB1168
2026 2026
authority may issue such types of bonds as it may determine, including,
without limiting the generality of the foregoing, bonds on which the
principal and interest are payable: (1) Exclusively from the income,
proceeds, and revenue of the redevelopment project financed with proceeds
of such bonds; (2) exclusively from the income, proceeds, and revenue of
any of its redevelopment projects whether or not they are financed in
whole or in part with the proceeds of such bonds; (3) exclusively from
its revenue and income, including any special assessment levied pursuant
to section 18-1722 and such tax revenue or receipts as may be authorized
under the Community Development Law, including those which may be pledged
under section 18-2150, and from such grants and loans as may be received;
or (4) from all or part of the income, proceeds, and revenue enumerated
in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this section. Any such bonds may be
additionally secured by a pledge of any loan, grant, or contributions, or
parts thereof, from the federal government or other source or a mortgage
of any redevelopment project or projects of the authority. The authority
shall not pledge the credit or taxing power of the state or any political
subdivision thereof, except such tax receipts as may be authorized under
this section or pledged under section 18-2150, or place any lien or
encumbrance on any property owned by the state, county, or city used by
the authority.
Sec. 4. Section 18-2125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-2125 Neither the members of an authority nor any person executing
the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the
issuance thereof. The bonds and other obligations of the authority, and
such bonds and obligations shall so state on their face, shall not be a
debt of the city and the city shall not be liable on such bonds, except
to the extent authorized by sections 18-2147 to 18-2150, nor in any event
shall such bonds or obligations be payable out of any funds or properties
other than those of said authority acquired for the purposes of the
-5-

LB1168 LB1168
2026 2026
Community Development Law, except to the extent authorized by sections
18-2147 to 18-2150. Except to the extent otherwise authorized, the bonds
shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any
constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction. Bonds of an
authority are declared to be issued for an essential public and
governmental purpose and to be public instrumentalities and, together
with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempt from all
Nebraska taxes. All bonds, except conduit revenue bonds issued pursuant
to subsection (3) of section 18-2147, shall be general obligations of the
authority issuing same and shall be payable out of any revenue, income,
receipts, proceeds, or other money of the authority, except as may be
otherwise provided in the instruments themselves.
An authority shall have power from time to time to issue bond
anticipation notes, referred to as notes herein, and from time to time to
issue renewal notes, such notes in any case to mature not later than
thirty months from the date of incurring the indebtedness represented
thereby in an amount not exceeding in the aggregate at any time
outstanding the amount of bonds then or theretofore authorized. Payment
of such notes shall be made from any money or revenue which the authority
may have available for such purpose or from the proceeds of the sale of
bonds of the authority, or such notes may be exchanged for a like amount
of such bonds. The authority may pledge such money or revenue of the
authority, subject to prior pledges thereof, if any, for the payment of
such notes, and may in addition secure the notes in the same manner as
herein provided for bonds. All notes shall be issued and sold in the same
manner as bonds, and any authority shall have power to make contracts for
the future sale from time to time of notes on terms and conditions stated
in such contracts, and the authority shall have power to pay such
consideration as it shall deem proper for any commitments to purchase
notes and bonds in the future. Such notes shall also be collaterally
secured by pledges and deposits with a bank or trust company, in trust
-6-

LB1168 LB1168
2026 2026
for the payment of such notes, of bonds in an aggregate amount at least
equal to the amount of such notes and, in any event, in an amount deemed
by the issuing authority sufficient to provide for the payment of the
notes in full at the maturity thereof. The authority may provide in the
collateral agreement that the notes may be exchanged for bonds held as
collateral security for the notes, or that the trustee may sell the bonds
if the notes are not otherwise paid at maturity, and apply the proceeds
of such sale to the payment of the notes. Such notes shall bear interest
at a rate set by the authority, and shall be sold at such price as shall
cause an interest cost thereon not to exceed such rate.
It is the intention hereof that any pledge of revenue, income,
receipts, proceeds, or other money made by an authority for the payment
of bonds or notes shall be valid and binding from the time such pledge is
made; that the revenue, income, receipts, proceeds, and other money so
pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be
subject to the lien of such pledge without the physical delivery thereof
or further act, and that the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and
binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort,
contract, or otherwise against the authority irrespective of whether such
parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other
instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.
Sec. 5. Section 18-2136, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-2136 All property including funds of an authority shall be exempt
from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and no execution or other
judicial process shall issue against such property nor shall judgment
against an authority be a charge or lien upon its property. The
provisions of this section shall not apply to or limit the right of
obligees to foreclose or otherwise enforce any taxpayer agreement entered
into pursuant to subsection (3) of section 18-2147 or any mortgage of an
authority or the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the
-7-

LB1168 LB1168
2026 2026
enforcement of any pledge or lien given by an authority on its rents,
fees, grants, or revenue.
Sec. 6. Section 18-2147, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
18-2147 (1) Any redevelopment plan as originally approved or as
later modified pursuant to section 18-2117 may contain a provision that
any ad valorem tax levied upon real property, or any portion thereof, in
a redevelopment project for the benefit of any public body shall be
divided, for the applicable period described in subsection (5) (4) of
this section, as follows:
(a) That portion of the ad valorem tax which is produced by the levy
at the rate fixed each year by or for each such public body upon the
redevelopment project valuation shall be paid into the funds of each such
public body in the same proportion as are all other taxes collected by or
for the body. When there is not a redevelopment project valuation on a
parcel or parcels, the county assessor shall determine the redevelopment
project valuation based upon the fair market valuation of the parcel or
parcels as of January 1 of the year prior to the year that the ad valorem
taxes are to be divided. The county assessor shall provide written notice
of the redevelopment project valuation to the authority as defined in
section 18-2103 and the owner. The authority or owner may protest the
valuation to the county board of equalization within thirty days after
the date of the valuation notice. All provisions of section 77-1502
except dates for filing of a protest, the period for hearing protests,
and the date for mailing notice of the county board of equalization's
decision are applicable to any protest filed pursuant to this section.
The county board of equalization shall decide any protest filed pursuant
to this section within thirty days after the filing of the protest. The
county clerk shall mail a copy of the decision made by the county board
of equalization on protests pursuant to this section to the authority or
owner within seven days after the board's decision. Any decision of the
-8-

LB1168 LB1168
2026 2026
county board of equalization may be appealed to the Tax Equalization and
Review Commission, in accordance with section 77-5013, within thirty days
after the date of the decision;
(b) That portion of the ad valorem tax on real property, as provided
in the redevelopment contract, bond resolution, or redevelopment plan, as
applicable, in the redevelopment project in excess of such amount, if
any, shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into a special fund
of the authority to be used solely to pay the principal of, the interest
on, and any premiums due in connection with the bonds of, loans, notes,
or advances of money to, or indebtedness incurred by, whether funded,
refunded, assumed, or otherwise, such authority for financing or
refinancing, in whole or in part, the redevelopment project. When such
bonds, loans, notes, advances of money, or indebtedness, including
interest and premiums due, have been paid, the authority shall so notify
the county assessor and county treasurer and all ad valorem taxes upon
taxable real property in such a redevelopment project shall be paid into
the funds of the respective public bodies. An authority may use a single
fund for purposes of this subdivision for all redevelopment projects or
may use a separate fund for each redevelopment project; and
(c) Any interest and penalties due for delinquent taxes shall be
paid into the funds of each public body in the same proportion as are all
other taxes collected by or for the public body.
(2) To the extent that a redevelopment plan authorizes the division
of ad valorem taxes levied upon only a portion of the real property
included in such redevelopment plan, any improvements funded by such
division of taxes shall be related to the redevelopment plan that
authorized such division of taxes.
(3)(a) An authority may enter into a redevelopment contract or adopt
a bond resolution or redevelopment plan pursuant to which it issues
conduit revenue bonds and under which the authority may pledge a
percentage, up to and including one hundred percent, of the annual excess
-9-

LB1168 LB1168
2026 2026
tax revenues described in subdivision (1)(b) of this section, if any,
toward the authority's obligations under the contract, resolution, or
plan. The ad valorem taxes to be pledged under this subsection shall be
placed into a special fund of the authority to be used solely to pay the
principal of, the interest on, and any premiums due in connection with
the bonds of the redevelopment project. When an authority has pledged
less than one hundred percent of the excess tax revenues under the
contract, resolution, or plan, the unpledged portion of ad valorem taxes
collected on the real property shall be paid into the funds of the
respective public bodies as provided in subdivision (1)(b) of this
section.
(b) An authority that issues one or more conduit revenue bonds
pursuant to subdivision (3)(a) of this section may enter into an
agreement with a taxpayer that limits the taxpayer's rights to challenge
the assessment of real property taxes on real property within a
redevelopment project or that guarantees, enhances, or otherwise further
secures bonds issued by the authority, such as by guaranteeing any
shortfall in real property taxes pledged to payment of the conduit
revenue bonds issued to support a redevelopment project, if (i) the
taxpayer's real property is within such redevelopment project and (ii)
the real property taxes levied upon such real property are subject to
division in accordance with subdivision (3)(a) of this section. The
obligation to make payments under a taxpayer agreement that guarantee,
enhance, or otherwise further secure conduit revenue bonds issued
pursuant to subdivision (3)(a) of this section shall be treated in the
same manner as property taxes for purposes of section 77-203 if, and to
the extent that, the taxpayer agreement provides for a property tax lien.
(c) A lien resulting from a taxpayer agreement described in
subdivision (3)(b) of this section takes priority over any existing or
subsequent mortgage, other lien, or other encumbrance on the property,
shall have parity with a property tax lien described in section 77-203,
-10-

LB1168 LB1168
2026 2026
and may be enforced and collected in all respects as real property taxes.
(4)(a) (3)(a) For any redevelopment plan located in a city of the
metropolitan class that includes a division of taxes, as provided in this
section, that produces, in whole or in part, funds to be used directly or
indirectly for (i) new construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of
housing for households with annual incomes below the area median income
for households and located within six hundred yards of a public passenger
streetcar or (ii) new construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of
single-family housing or condominium housing used as primary residences
for individuals with annual incomes below the area median income for
individuals, such housing shall be deemed related to the redevelopment
plan that authorized such division of taxes regardless of whether such
housing is or will be located on real property within such redevelopment
plan, as long as such housing supports activities occurring on or
identified in such redevelopment plan.
(b) During each fiscal year in which the funds described in
subdivision (a) of this subsection are available, the authority and city
shall make best efforts to allocate not less than thirty percent of such
funds to single-family housing deemed related to the redevelopment plan
described under such subdivision.
(c) In selecting projects to receive funding, the authority and city
shall develop a qualified allocation plan and give first priority to
financially viable projects that serve the lowest income occupants for
the longest period of time.
(5)(a) (4)(a) For any redevelopment plan for which more than fifty
percent of the property in the redevelopment project area has been
declared an extremely blighted area in accordance with section
18-2101.02, ad valorem taxes shall be divided for a period not to exceed
twenty years after the effective date as identified in the project
redevelopment contract or in the resolution of the authority authorizing
the issuance of bonds pursuant to section 18-2124.
-11-

LB1168 LB1168
2026 2026
(b) For all other redevelopment plans, ad valorem taxes shall be
divided for a period not to exceed fifteen years after the effective date
as identified in the project redevelopment contract, in the resolution of
the authority authorizing the issuance of bonds pursuant to section
18-2124, or in the redevelopment plan, whichever is applicable.
(6) (5) The effective date of a provision dividing ad valorem taxes
as provided in subsection (5) (4) of this section shall not occur until
such time as the real property in the redevelopment project is within the
corporate boundaries of the city. This subsection shall not apply to a
redevelopment project involving a formerly used defense site as
authorized in section 18-2123.01.
(7) (6) All notices of the provision for dividing ad valorem taxes
shall be sent by the authority to the county assessor on forms prescribed
by the Property Tax Administrator. The notice shall be sent to the county
assessor on or before July 1 of the year of the effective date of the
provision. Failure to satisfy the notice requirement of this section
shall result in the taxes, for all taxable years affected by the failure
to give notice of the effective date of the provision, remaining
undivided and being paid into the funds for each public body receiving
property taxes generated by the property in the redevelopment project.
However, the redevelopment project valuation for the remaining division
of ad valorem taxes in accordance with subdivisions (1)(a) and (b) of
this section shall be the last certified valuation for the taxable year
prior to the effective date of the provision to divide the taxes for the
remaining portion of the twenty-year or fifteen-year period pursuant to
subsection (5) (4) of this section.
Sec. 7. Original sections 18-2124, 18-2125, and 18-2136, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, section 18-2117.01, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 18-2101.02 and 18-2147, Revised
Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-12-